Illinois, session 104th, HB915.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Data Governance and Organization to Support 5Equity and Racial Justice Act is amended by changing Section 620-1 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 65/20-1)8    Sec. 20-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 9the Data Governance and Organization to Support Equity and 10Racial Justice Act. References in this Article to "this Act" 11mean this Article.12(Source: P.A. 101-654, eff. 3-8-21.)